District of Columbia statutes.
42-3173.03

Redevelopment feasibility analysis.

(a)

Prior to posting, mailing, publishing, or filing a notice of initial determination of a deteriorated structure under § 42-3173.05(b), the Mayor shall request from the Department an analysis of the cost of rehabilitating the structure and the feasibility and likelihood that the site will be redeveloped without demolition of the structure. Upon requesting the analysis, the Mayor shall cause notice of the request to be published in the District of Columbia Register. The Mayor shall consider the analysis provided by the Department in determining whether to issue a notice of initial determination under § 42-3173.05.

(b)

If the Department does not provide an analysis to the Mayor within 60 days after the Mayor requests an analysis under subsection (a) of this section, the Mayor may post, mail, publish, or file the notice of initial determination under § 42-3173.05(b).

History

Apr. 27, 2001, D.C. Law 13-281, § 443
as added Apr. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-114, § 102, 49 DCR 1468

Section References

This section is referenced in § 42-3173.02 and § 42-3173.05.